District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.59

Effect of later repeal or amendment.

Any violation of any provision of law or regulation issued hereunder which is repealed or amended by this subchapter, and any liability arising under such provisions or regulations may, if the violation occurred or the liability arose prior to such repeal or amendment, be prosecuted to the same extent as if this subchapter had not been enacted.

History

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3x
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).